Washington statutes.
RCW 43.10.150

Legal services revolving fund—Created—Purpose.

A legal services revolving fund is hereby created in the state treasury for the purpose of a centralized funding, accounting, and distribution of the actual costs of the legal services provided to agencies of the state government by the attorney general. During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the legal services revolving account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance of the account.

[ 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 975; 1974 ex.s. c 146 s 1; 1971 ex.s. c 71 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2013 2nd sp.s. c 4: See note following RCW 2.68.020.

Effective date—1974 ex.s. c 146: "This act shall take effect on July 1, 1974 for costs, billings and charges affecting the 1975 fiscal year and subsequent biennia." [ 1974 ex.s. c 146 s 5.]

Legal services revolving fund—Approval of certain changes required: RCW 43.88.350.